Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1983 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to sec. 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982, and in 1981, 1983, 1989, 1998, 2010, and 2018 to make other minor word changes.

Collateral references. —

Robert L. Hahne, Accounting for Public Utilities, (Matthew Bender).